Utah statutes.
63H-6-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the board of directors of the corporation.

(2)  "Corporation" means the Utah State Fair Corporation created by this chapter.

(3)  "State fair park" means the property owned by the state located at 155 North 1000 West, Salt Lake City, Utah.

